Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.010

Legislative finding and declaration.

The legislature finds and declares that advertising, sales, and business practices of certain sellers of travel have worked financial hardship upon the people of this state; that the travel business has a significant impact upon the economy and well-being of this state and its people; that problems have arisen regarding certain sales of travel; and that the public welfare requires registration of sellers of travel in order to eliminate unfair advertising, sales and business practices. The legislature further finds it necessary to establish standards that will safeguard the people against financial hardship and to encourage fair dealing and prosperity in the travel business.

[ 1994 c 237 s 1; 1986 c 283 s 1.]